Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-2023
County, municipality, or agency; regulations authorized; limitations; noncompliance fee.

A county, municipality, or agency may, by ordinance or resolution, adopt regulations governing collection, source separation, storage, transportation, transfer, processing, treatment, and disposal of solid waste within its solid waste jurisdiction area as necessary to protect the public health and welfare and the environment. Regulations authorized by this section shall be equal to or more stringent than the provisions of the Integrated Solid Waste Management Act and rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the council as authorized by the act. Any person who violates any such regulation shall be subject to a noncompliance fee not to exceed five hundred dollars.

Laws 1992, LB 1257, § 23.